Florida, session 2026, SB1548.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âParagraphs (a), (d), and (n) of subsection (7) 37 of section 125.01055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 38 125.01055âAffordable housing.â 39 (7)(a)âA county must authorize multifamily and mixed-use 40 residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for commercial, 41 industrial, or mixed use, and in portions of any flexibly zoned 42 area such as a planned unit development permitted for 43 commercial, industrial, or mixed use, and on property owned by a 44 county, municipality, or school district, if at least 40 percent 45 of the residential units in a proposed multifamily development 46 are rental units that, for a period of at least 30 years, are 47 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. Notwithstanding any other 48 law, local ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a county 49 may not require a proposed multifamily development to obtain a 50 zoning or land use change, special exception, conditional use 51 approval, variance, transfer of density or development units, 52 amendment to a development of regional impact, or comprehensive 53 plan amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities 54 authorized under this subsection. For mixed-use residential 55 projects, at least 65 percent of the total square footage must 56 be used for residential purposes. The county may not require 57 that more than 10 percent of the total square footage of such 58 mixed-use residential projects be used for nonresidential 59 purposes. A proposed development on property owned by a county, 60 municipality, or school district must be within the geographic 61 boundaries of the respective county, municipality, or school 62 district, and the respective county, municipality, or school 63 district must be a party to the application for the proposed 64 development. 65 (d)1.âA county may not restrict the height of a proposed 66 development authorized under this subsection below the highest 67 currently allowed, or allowed on July 1, 2023, height for a 68 commercial or residential building located in its jurisdiction 69 within 1 mile of the proposed development or three stories, 70 whichever is higher. A county may not restrict height below the 71 height authorized under this paragraph through other dimensional 72 means, such as height determined by setbacks or stepbacks, or 73 vice versa, or require setbacks or stepbacks that are more 74 restrictive than the minimum setbacks or stepbacks of the 75 underlying zoning applicable to the proposed development. For 76 purposes of this paragraph, the term âhighest currently allowed 77 heightâ does not include the height of any building that met the 78 requirements of this subsection or the height of any building 79 that has received any bonus, variance, or other special 80 exception for height provided in the countyâs land development 81 regulations as an incentive for development. 82 2.âIf the proposed development is adjacent to, on two or 83 more sides, a parcel zoned for single-family residential use 84 which is within a single-family residential development with at 85 least 25 contiguous single-family homes, the county may restrict 86 the height of the proposed development to 150 percent of the 87 tallest building on any property adjacent to the proposed 88 development, the highest currently allowed, or allowed on July 89 1, 2023, height for the property provided in the countyâs land 90 development regulations, or three stories, whichever is higher, 91 not to exceed 10 stories. For the purposes of this paragraph, 92 the term âadjacent toâ means those properties sharing more than 93 one point of a property line, but does not include properties 94 separated by a public road. 95 3.âIf the proposed development is on a parcel with a 96 contributing structure or building within a historic district 97 which was listed in the National Register of Historic Places 98 before January 1, 2000, or is on a parcel with a structure or 99 building individually listed in the National Register of 100 Historic Places, the county may restrict the height of the 101 proposed development to the highest currently allowed, or 102 allowed on July 1, 2023, height for a commercial or residential 103 building located in its jurisdiction within three-fourths of a 104 mile of the proposed development or three stories, whichever is 105 higher. The term âhighest currently allowedâ in this paragraph 106 includes the maximum height allowed for any building in a zoning 107 district irrespective of any conditions. 108 (n)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 109 1.ââCommercial useâ means activities associated with the 110 sale, rental, or distribution of products or the performance of 111 services related thereto. The term includes, but is not limited 112 to, such uses or activities as retail sales; wholesale sales; 113 rentals of equipment, goods, or products; offices; restaurants; 114 public lodging establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(a); 115 food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; tourist 116 attractions; and other for-profit business activities. A parcel 117 zoned to permit such uses by right without the requirement to 118 obtain a variance or waiver is considered commercial use for the 119 purposes of this section, irrespective of the local land 120 development regulationâs listed category or title. The term does 121 not include home-based businesses or cottage food operations 122 undertaken on residential property, public lodging 123 establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(c), or uses that 124 are accessory, ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or 125 allowed only on a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as 126 golf courses, tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, 127 within an area designated for residential use are not commercial 128 use, irrespective of how they are operated. Farms and farm 129 operations as those terms are defined in s. 823.14(3) and uses 130 associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of 131 products raised on the premises, are not commercial use. 132 2.ââIndustrial useâ means activities associated with the 133 manufacture, assembly, processing, or storage of products or the 134 performance of services related thereto. The term includes, but 135 is not limited to, such uses or activities as automobile 136 manufacturing or repair, boat manufacturing or repair, junk 137 yards, meat packing facilities, citrus processing and packing 138 facilities, produce processing and packing facilities, 139 electrical generating plants, water treatment plants, sewage 140 treatment plants, and solid waste disposal sites. A parcel zoned 141 to permit such uses by right without the requirement to obtain a 142 variance or waiver is considered industrial use for the purposes 143 of this section, irrespective of the local land development 144 regulationâs listed category or title. The term does not include 145 uses that are accessory, ancillary, incidental to the allowable 146 uses, or allowed only on a temporary basis. Recreational uses, 147 such as golf courses, tennis courts, swimming pools, and 148 clubhouses, within an area designated for residential use are 149 not industrial use, irrespective of how they are operated. Farms 150 and farm operations as those terms are defined in s. 823.14(3) 151 and uses associated therewith, including the packaging and sale 152 of products raised on the premises, are not industrial use. 153 3.ââMixed useâ means any use that combines multiple types 154 of approved land uses from at least two of the residential use, 155 commercial use, and industrial use categories. The term does not 156 include uses that are accessory, ancillary, incidental to the 157 allowable uses, or allowed only on a temporary basis. 158 Recreational uses, such as golf courses, tennis courts, swimming 159 pools, and clubhouses, within an area designated for residential 160 use are not mixed use, irrespective of how they are operated. 161 4.ââPlanned unit developmentâ has the same meaning as 162 provided in s. 163.3202(5)(b). 163 Section 2.âParagraphs (a), (d), and (n) of subsection (7) 164 of section 166.04151, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 165 166.04151âAffordable housing.â 166 (7)(a)âA municipality must authorize multifamily and mixed 167 use residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for 168 commercial, industrial, or mixed use, and in portions of any 169 flexibly zoned area such as a planned unit development permitted 170 for commercial, industrial, or mixed use, and on property owned 171 by a county, municipality, or school district, if at least 40 172 percent of the residential units in a proposed multifamily 173 development are rental units that, for a period of at least 30 174 years, are affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. Notwithstanding 175 any other law, local ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a 176 municipality may not require a proposed multifamily development 177 to obtain a zoning or land use change, special exception, 178 conditional use approval, variance, transfer of density or 179 development units, amendment to a development of regional 180 impact, amendment to a municipal charter, or comprehensive plan 181 amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities 182 authorized under this subsection. For mixed-use residential 183 projects, at least 65 percent of the total square footage must 184 be used for residential purposes. The municipality may not 185 require that more than 10 percent of the total square footage of 186 such mixed-use residential projects be used for nonresidential 187 purposes. A proposed development on property owned by a county, 188 municipality, or school district must be within the geographic 189 boundaries of the respective county, municipality, or school 190 district, and the respective county, municipality, or school 191 district must be a party to the application for the proposed 192 development. 193 (d)1.âA municipality may not restrict the height of a 194 proposed development authorized under this subsection below the 195 highest currently allowed, or allowed on July 1, 2023, height 196 for a commercial or residential building located in its 197 jurisdiction within 1 mile of the proposed development or three 198 stories, whichever is higher. A municipality may not restrict 199 height below the height authorized under this paragraph through 200 other dimensional means, such as height determined by setbacks 201 or stepbacks, or vice versa, or require setbacks or stepbacks 202 that are more restrictive than the minimum setbacks or stepbacks 203 of the underlying zoning applicable to the proposed development. 204 For purposes of this paragraph, the term âhighest currently 205 allowed heightâ does not include the height of any building that 206 met the requirements of this subsection or the height of any 207 building that has received any bonus, variance, or other special 208 exception for height provided in the municipalityâs land 209 development regulations as an incentive for development. 210 2.âIf the proposed development is adjacent to, on two or 211 more sides, a parcel zoned for single-family residential use 212 that is within a single-family residential development with at 213 least 25 contiguous single-family homes, the municipality may 214 restrict the height of the proposed development to 150 percent 215 of the tallest building on any property adjacent to the proposed 216 development, the highest currently allowed, or allowed on July 217 1, 2023, height for the property provided in the municipalityâs 218 land development regulations, or three stories, whichever is 219 higher, not to exceed 10 stories. For the purposes of this 220 paragraph, the term âadjacent toâ means those properties sharing 221 more than one point of a property line, but does not include 222 properties separated by a public road or body of water, 223 including manmade lakes or ponds. For a proposed development 224 located within a municipality within an area of critical state 225 concern as designated by s. 380.0552 or chapter 28-36, Florida 226 Administrative Code, the term âstoryâ includes only the 227 habitable space above the base flood elevation as designated by 228 the Federal Emergency Management Agency in the most current 229 Flood Insurance Rate Map. A story may not exceed 10 feet in 230 height measured from finished floor to finished floor, including 231 space for mechanical equipment. The highest story may not exceed 232 10 feet from finished floor to the top plate. 233 3.âIf the proposed development is on a parcel with a 234 contributing structure or building within a historic district 235 which was listed in the National Register of Historic Places 236 before January 1, 2000, or is on a parcel with a structure or 237 building individually listed in the National Register of 238 Historic Places, the municipality may restrict the height of the 239 proposed development to the highest currently allowed, or 240 allowed on July 1, 2023, height for a commercial or residential 241 building located in its jurisdiction within three-fourths of a 242 mile of the proposed development or three stories, whichever is 243 higher. The term âhighest currently allowedâ in this paragraph 244 includes the maximum height allowed for any building in a zoning 245 district irrespective of any conditions. 246 (n)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 247 1.ââCommercial useâ means activities associated with the 248 sale, rental, or distribution of products or the performance of 249 services related thereto. The term includes, but is not limited 250 to, such uses or activities as retail sales; wholesale sales; 251 rentals of equipment, goods, or products; offices; restaurants; 252 public lodging establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(a); 253 food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; tourist 254 attractions; and other for-profit business activities. A parcel 255 zoned to permit such uses by right without the requirement to 256 obtain a variance or waiver is considered commercial use for the 257 purposes of this section, irrespective of the local land 258 development regulationâs listed category or title. The term does 259 not include home-based businesses or cottage food operations 260 undertaken on residential property, public lodging 261 establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(c), or uses that 262 are accessory, ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or 263 allowed only on a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as 264 golf courses, tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, 265 within an area designated for residential use are not commercial 266 use, irrespective of how they are operated. Farms and farm 267 operations as those terms are defined in s. 823.14(3) and uses 268 associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of 269 products raised on the premises, are not commercial use. 270 2.ââIndustrial useâ means activities associated with the 271 manufacture, assembly, processing, or storage of products or the 272 performance of services related thereto. The term includes, but 273 is not limited to, such uses or activities as automobile 274 manufacturing or repair, boat manufacturing or repair, junk 275 yards, meat packing facilities, citrus processing and packing 276 facilities, produce processing and packing facilities, 277 electrical generating plants, water treatment plants, sewage 278 treatment plants, and solid waste disposal sites. A parcel zoned 279 to permit such uses by right without the requirement to obtain a 280 variance or waiver is considered industrial use for the purposes 281 of this section, irrespective of the local land development 282 regulationâs listed category or title. The term does not include 283 uses that are accessory, ancillary, incidental to the allowable 284 uses, or allowed only on a temporary basis. Recreational uses, 285 such as golf courses, tennis courts, swimming pools, and 286 clubhouses, within an area designated for residential use are 287 not industrial use, irrespective of how they are operated. Farms 288 and farm operations as those terms are defined in s. 823.14(3) 289 and uses associated therewith, including the packaging and sale 290 of products raised on the premises, are not industrial use. 291 3.ââMixed useâ means any use that combines multiple types 292 of approved land uses from at least two of the residential use, 293 commercial use, and industrial use categories. The term does not 294 include uses that are accessory, ancillary, incidental to the 295 allowable uses, or allowed only on a temporary basis. 296 Recreational uses, such as golf courses, tennis courts, swimming 297 pools, and clubhouses, within an area designated for residential 298 use are not mixed use, irrespective of how they are operated. 299 4.ââPlanned unit developmentâ has the same meaning as 300 provided in s. 163.3202(5)(b). 301 Section 3.âAn applicant for a proposed development 302 authorized under s. 125.01055(7), Florida Statutes, or s. 303 166.04151(7), Florida Statutes, who submitted an application, a 304 written request, or a notice of intent to use such provisions to 305 the county or municipality and which application, written 306 request, or notice of intent has been received by the county or 307 municipality, as applicable, before July 1, 2026, may notify the 308 county or municipality by July 1, 2026, of its intent to proceed 309 under the provisions of s. 125.01055(7), Florida Statutes, or s. 310 166.04151(7), Florida Statutes, as they existed at the time of 311 submittal. A county or municipality, as applicable, shall allow 312 an applicant who submitted such an application, written request, 313 or notice of intent before July 1, 2026, the opportunity to 314 submit a revised application, written request, or notice of 315 intent to account for the changes made by this act. 316 Section 4.âSubsection (5) of section 333.03, Florida 317 Statutes, is amended to read: 318 333.03âRequirement to adopt airport zoning regulations.â 319 (5)âSections 125.01055(7) and 166.04151(7) do not apply to 320 any of the following, unless the respective application is 321 approved by the governing body of the airport: 322 (a)âA proposed development near a runway within one-quarter 323 of a mile laterally from the runway edge and within an area that 324 is the width of one-quarter of a mile extending at right angles 325 from the end of the runway for a distance of 10,000 feet of any 326 existing airport runway or planned airport runway identified in 327 the local governmentâs airport master plan. 328 (b)âA proposed development within any airport noise zone 329 identified in the federal land use compatibility table or in a 330 land-use zoning or airport noise regulation adopted by the local 331 government. 332 (c)âA proposed development that exceeds maximum height 333 restrictions identified in the political subdivisionâs airport 334 zoning regulation adopted pursuant to this section. 335 Section 5.âSubsection (8) of section 760.22, Florida 336 Statutes, is amended to read: 337 760.22âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 760.20-760.37, the term: 338 (8)ââPersonâ includes one or more individuals, 339 corporations, partnerships, associations, labor organizations, 340 legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, 341 trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in 342 bankruptcy, receivers, and fiduciaries, agencies, governmental 343 entities, and other legal or commercial entities. 344 Section 6.âSection 760.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to 345 read: 346 760.26âProhibited discrimination in land use decisions and 347 in permitting of development.âIt is unlawful to discriminate in 348 land use decisions or in the permitting of development based on 349 race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, 350 or religion, or, except as otherwise provided by law, based on 351 the source of financing of a development or proposed 352 development, including, but not limited to, financing of a 353 development or on a proposed development for housing that is 354 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. 355 Section 7.âSubsection (4) of section 760.35, Florida 356 Statutes, is amended to read: 357 760.35âCivil actions and relief; administrative 358 procedures.â 359 (4)âIf the court finds that a person has engaged in a 360 discriminatory housing practice has occurred, it must shall 361 issue an order prohibiting the practice and providing 362 affirmative relief from the effects of the practice, including 363 injunctive and other equitable relief, actual and punitive 364 damages, and reasonable attorney fees and costs. In accordance 365 with s. 13, Art. X of the State Constitution, the state, for 366 itself and its agencies or political subdivisions, waives 367 sovereign immunity for a cause of action based upon the 368 application of this section. Such waiver is limited only to 369 actions brought under this section. 370 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.